Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-11] Disclosure of digital assets
held in trust when trustee is original user. Unless otherwise ordered by
the court or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that
is an original user of an account any digital asset of the account held in
trust, including a catalogue of electronic communications of the trustee and
the content of electronic communications. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next